Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 3. Small Business Loans.

Administrative Code. —

For small business loan assumptions, see 3 AAC 86.

Sec. 45.81.200.
Powers and duties of Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development in general.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall formulate general policies and adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

, including regulations to establish fees for services provided and charges for collecting the fees. The department may collect the fees and collection charges established.

The department may hold hearings and subpoena witnesses and documents, and administer oaths in connection with hearings.

The department shall

cooperate with the state and its political subdivisions and agencies;

adopt regulations necessary for the conduct of its business and for carrying out the provisions of AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

, and make necessary regulations to maintain such standards;

require bonds and undertakings from persons employed by it as shall in its judgment be necessary, and pay the premiums on them;

establish such regional and local offices and such advisory groups as may be necessary or considered expedient to carry out or assist in carrying out its duties and authority.

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1971; am § 109 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 85 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

45.95.010

.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 45.81.210.
Small business loans.

The commissioner shall, under regulations and policies adopted by the commissioner, make small business loans to acquire, finance, or refinance or equip businesses, including farming, mining, and fishing, not exceeding $500,000. The loans shall be secured by acceptable collateral and may not exceed 75 percent of the appraised value of the collateral offered as security. The rate of interest may not exceed nine and one-half percent a year on the unpaid balance. For the purposes of this subsection business equipment includes, but is not limited to, fire protection systems approved under AS

18.70.081

and farming equipment.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 122 SLA 1980.]

[Repealed, § 108 ch 59 SLA 1982.]

Money loaned shall be delivered to the borrower as provided in AS

37.25.050

, vouchered in the manner prescribed for state disbursing officers, and charged against the small business revolving loan fund. Each voucher shall be approved by the commissioner or a bonded deputy authorized to act as a certifying officer. Upon repayment of loans by installments, or otherwise, in accordance with the prescribed terms, or upon liquidation by foreclosure or other process, or upon receipt of interest, the money so received shall be turned over to the commissioner of revenue for deposit in the small business revolving loan fund.

The commissioner may not disqualify an applicant for, or prejudice an applicant’s privilege to receive, a loan to purchase and install a fire protection system solely because of a loan already made to the applicant under AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 1974; am § 110 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 6 ch 139 SLA 1977; am § 25 ch 72 SLA 1979; am §§ 6, 7 ch 45 SLA 1980; am § 14 ch 122 SLA 1980; am § 108 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 86 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 27 ch 175 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.95.020.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Section 71(2), ch. 106, SLA 1980 provides that no further loans may be made under this section after July 1, 1981.

Sec. 45.81.220.
Sale or transfer of mortgages and notes.

The commissioner may sell or transfer at par value or at a premium or discount to any bank or other private purchaser for cash or other consideration the mortgages and notes held by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development as security for loans made under AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

.

[Repealed, § 33 ch 141 SLA 1988.]

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1971; am § 112 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 26 ch 72 SLA 1979; am § 33 ch 141 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

45.95.040

.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For repossessed property, see 3 AAC 77.

Sec. 45.81.230.
Disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall dispose of property acquired through default or foreclosure of a loan made under AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

.
Disposal shall be made in a manner that serves the best interests of the state, and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years.

History.

(§ 29 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

45.95.055

.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 45.81.240.
Creation of fund.

There is created the small business revolving loan fund to carry out the purposes of AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

. This fund shall be used for no other purpose.

Money in the fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for costs of administering AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1971; am § 87 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.95.060.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Cross references. —

For annual appropriation of cash balance attributable to loans owned by the fund, see § 4, ch. 156, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 45.81.250.
Special account established.

There is established as a special account within the small business revolving loan fund the foreclosure expense account. This account is established as a reserve from fund equity.

The commissioner may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the state’s security interest in collateral on loans made under AS

45.81.210

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after a default by an obligor.

History.

(§ 30 ch 79 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.95.065.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.210

” was substituted for “AS 45.95.020”.

Sec. 45.81.260.
Eligibility for loans.

A person is eligible for a loan under AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

if

the person can establish or demonstrate good character, capacity for financial responsibility, ability to provide sufficient collateral and knowledge of Alaska economic conditions;

the person is a resident of the state; and

in the judgment of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development

the business shows a definite potential for growth;

the borrower will be able to repay the loan; and

the loan will potentially create more jobs and provide additional services in the community.

History.

(§ 8 ch 109 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 1974; am § 114 ch 218 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.95.070.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 45.81.290.
Definition.

In AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

, “commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development.

History.

(§ 115 ch 218 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 45.95.080.
Renumbered in 2006, at which time “AS

45.81.200

—

45.81.290

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.